src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON соб-мо_a_й_shortFPat
й+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:й MSgStem_anim ;
й+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:й ыPlStem_anim ;
е:е Patronymic_stem ;
е: Patronymic_ич ;
е: Patronymic_вна ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a_ь
ь+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:ь MSgStem_anim ;
ь+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:ь ыPlStem_anim ;
е:е Patronymic_stem ;
е: Patronymic_ич ;

LEXICON соб-мо_a_26
ий+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:ий MSgStem_anim ;
ий+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:ий ыPlStem_anim ;
ье:ье Patronymic_stem ;
ье:ь Patronymic_ич ;

LEXICON мо_a_Plья_ьев
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ин_ева ! хозяин
+N+Msc:ин MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:ево аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a2
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_zero ;

LEXICON мо_a2_0_е ! цыган
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: Pl_ин_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a[2]
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%> # ;

LEXICON мо_a-
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON мо_a-_господь
+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:госпо́дь # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:го́спода # ;
+N+Msc:го́спод MSgObliqStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:го́спод ыPlStem_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON мо_a_ин_Root
+N+Msc:ин MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: Pl_ин_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ин_Suffix
+N+Msc:и́н MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: Pl_ин_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ин_ы
+N+Msc:и́н MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_шурин
+N+Msc:ин MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:ин ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fей аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ёнок
+N+Msc:ён%^Fок MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:я́та аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ёнок_еня́та
+N+Msc:ён%^Fок MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:еня́та аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_о́нок_еня́та
+N+Msc:о́н%^Fок MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:еня́та аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ёночек
+N+Msc:ёноч%^Fек MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:я́т%^Fока ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_ребёночек
+N+Msc:ребёноч%^Fек MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:де́т%^Fоко ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_о́нок
+N+Msc:о́н%^Fок MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:а́та аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_о́ночек
+N+Msc:о́ноч%^Fек MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:а́т%^Fока ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_щено́чек
+N+Msc:о́ч%^Fек MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:о́ч%^Fек ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:я́т%^Fока ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_a_щено́к
+N+Msc:%^Fо́к MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fо́к ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:я́та аPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мн._[мо_a]
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мн._[мо_a]_3
мн._[мо_a] ;

LEXICON мо_a_SPl
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:ь ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_b
+N+Msc: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мн._[мо_b]
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_b_христос
+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:о́с # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:а́ # ;
+N+Msc: MSgObliqEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON соб-мо_b_христос
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:о́с # ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:а́ # ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: MSgObliqEnd_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON соб-мо_b
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;
о:%>о́ Patronymic_stem ; !TODO FIX Get rid of stem boundary. This will require more than one LEXICON

LEXICON мо_c
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c_барин
+N+Msc:ба́рин MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:госпо́да́ аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_ин_а
+N+Msc:и́н MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:о аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_JPl-ЕЙ
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fе́йя́ аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_Plовья-ей
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:ов%^Fе́йя́ аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_Plовья-ёв
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:ов%^Fе́й аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_Г_ЗЬ
+N+Msc:г MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:з%^Fе́йя́ аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_Ь_ЬЯ-ЕЙ
+N+Msc:ь MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fе́йя аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_c1_Ь_ЬЯ-ЁВ
+N+Msc:ь MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fе́й аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_d
+N+Msc: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_e
+N+Msc: MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON мо_e_черт
+N+Msc:ёрт MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:е́рть ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON мо_e_зверь
мо_e ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins+Fac:%>ьми́ # ;

LEXICON мо_f
+N+Msc: MSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlAnom_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a]
+N+Msc: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: аPlStem_anim ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON мо_ребенок
+N+Msc:ребён%^Fок MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:де́ть ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc:дете́й # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen:дете́й # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc:де́тях # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat:де́тям # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins:детьми́ # ;

LEXICON мо_человек
+N+Msc:челове́к ыPlStem_anim_Use/Obs ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen+Count:челове́к # ;
мо_человек2 ;

LEXICON мо_человек2
+N+Msc:челове́к MSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:лю́дь ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc:люде́й # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen:люде́й # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc:лю́дях # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat:лю́дям # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins:людьми́ # ;

LEXICON мо-жо_0
мо_0 ;
жо_0 ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_a]
+N+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_a]_GPlов
+N+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_ов ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_a2]
+N+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_ей ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_a[2]]
+N+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ей # ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_b]_судия
+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:%>ы́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:%>и́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:%>и́ # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:%>е́й # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>е́ю # ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim_й ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_c]_я_ья́/ёв
+N+Msc:я FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc:%^Fе́й аPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[мс_a]
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_a_Msc_anim ;
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[мс-п_b]
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_b_Msc_anim ;
+N+Msc: Noun_мс-п_b_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON мо-жо_a
мо_[жо_a] ;
жо_a ;

LEXICON мо-жо_a_пария
мо-жо_a ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;
! +N+Fem+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;

LEXICON мо-жо_a2
мо_[жо_a2] ;
жо_a2 ;

LEXICON мо-жо_a[2]
мо_[жо_a[2]] ;
жо_a[2] ;

LEXICON соб-мо_[жо_a] !TODO FIX CHECK Some of these can hypothetically have patronymics (not the hypochoristics)
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON соб-мо_[жо_a]_28
а+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:а FSgStem_anim ;
а+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc:а ыPlStem_anim ;
ич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ич MSgStem_anim ;
ич+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Msc:ич ыPlStem_anim ;
ична+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:ична FSgStem_anim ;
ична+N+Prop+Sem/Pat+Fem:ична ыPlStem_anim ;
о:%>о Patronymic_stem_Fac ;  !TODO FIX Get rid of stem boundary. This will require more than one LEXICON

LEXICON соб-мо_[жо_a?]
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_gPrb ;

LEXICON соб-мо-жо_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: FSgStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Ant+Fem: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_b] ! This also includes жо_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Msc: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_b]_Р._мн._затрудн. ! This also includes жо_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Msc: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim_gPrb ;

LEXICON мо-жо_b
мо_[жо_b] ;
жо_b ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_b-] ! This also includes жо_b' because of the fleeting vowel rule in twolc
+N+Msc: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim_Prb ;

LEXICON мо-жо_b-
мо_[жо_b-] ;
жо_b- ;

LEXICON мо-жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн.
мо-жо_b- ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_d]
+N+Msc: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо-жо_d
мо_[жо_d] ;
жо_d ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_d2]
+N+Msc: FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_ей ;

LEXICON мо-жо_d2
мо_[жо_d2] ;
жо_d2 ;

LEXICON мо_[жо_f_ова]
+N+Msc:ова́ FSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc:ова́ ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc:о́в # ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen:о́в # ;
+N+Msc:ова́ PlPeriphEnd_anim ;

LEXICON мо-жо_f_ова
мо_[жо_f_ова] ;
жо_f_ова ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a]
+N+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;
+N+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a_R]
+N+Msc: MSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;
+N+Msc: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a']
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a-]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/b2]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/b]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/c'']
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/c']
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/c'~]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a/c]
мо_[п_a] ;

LEXICON мо_[п_a1]
мо_[п_a] ;
