src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
супруги:супру́г мн._[мо_a] ;
родители:роди́тель мн._[мо_a] ;
нелюди:не́людь мн._[мо_a]_3 "weight: 3.1298569142430335" ; ! (употр._преимущ._И.)
глисты:глист мн._[мо_b] ;
паря:па́ря мо_[жо_a2] "weight: 3.6183535117926313" ;
карла:ка́рла мо_[жо_a] ;
кшатрия:кша́трия мо_[жо_a]_GPlов ;
паша:па́ша́ мо_[жо_b] ;
судия:су́дия́ мо_[жо_b]_судия ;
сатана:сата́на́ мо_[жо_b]_Р._мн._затрудн. "weight: 4.028972357839514" ;
старина:стари́на́ мо_[жо_b-] "weight: 4.242449966649398" ;
дядя:дя́д мо_[жо_c]_я_ья́/ёв "weight: 5.331028962286554" ;
судья:су́д%^Fе́йя́ мо_[жо_d] "weight: 4.693398533285325" ; ! Р._мн._суде/й//_су/дей
голова:го́л мо_[жо_f_ова] "weight: 6.064325419692353" ;
сердечкин:серде́чкин мо_[мс_a] ;
свой:сво́й мо_[мс-п_b] ;
взрослый:взро́сл мо_[п_a'] "weight: 4.019130694072084" ;
подчинённый:подчинён%^Fён мо_[п_a/b2] ;
чёрный:чёр%^Fён мо_[п_a/b] ;
красный:кра́с%^Fен мо_[п_a/c''] "weight: 4.505249146315957" ;
пьяный:пья́н мо_[п_a/c'] "weight: 4.008636136670301" ;
нечистый:нечи́ст мо_[п_a/c'~] "weight: 3.1298569142430335" ;
нищий:ни́щ мо_[п_a/c] "weight: 3.683189781484801" ;
новопреставленный:новопреста́влен%^Fен мо_[п_a1] ;
свободный:свобо́д%^Fен мо_[п_a] "weight: 4.2140097011478215" ;
трудящийся:трудя́щ мо_[п_a_R] ;
всевышний:всевы́ш%^Fень мо_[п_a-] "weight: 3.4192894411281696" ;
страшило:страши́ло мо_[со_a] ;
щеночек:щен мо_a_щено́чек ;
медбрат:мѐдбра́т мо_a_Plья_ьев ;
собрат:собра́т мо_a_Plья_ьев "weight: 3.9819118942559406" ;
сосед:сосе́д мо_a_SPl "weight: 5.121812267029391" ;
удин:уди́н мо_a2 ;
хазар:хаза́р мо_a2 ;
цыган:цыга́н мо_a2_0_е "weight: 3.9563200257365843" ;
туркмен:туркме́н мо_a[2] "weight: 3.2324373153488297" ;
тохар:тоха́р мо_a[2] ;
богочеловек:бо̀гочелове́к мо_a- ;
господь: мо_a-_господь "weight: 4.959420015915733" ;
гробовщик:гробовщи́к мо_b ;
осёл:ос%^Fёл мо_b ;
щенок:щен мо_a_щено́к "weight: 4.305799185394459" ;
христос:христ мо_b_христос ;
муж:му́ж мо_c "weight: 5.369723129674114" ;
пан:па́н мо_c ;
друг:дру́ мо_c1_Г_ЗЬ "weight: 6.009925954593955" ;
зять:зя́т мо_c1_Ь_ЬЯ-ЁВ "weight: 4.273088554957017" ;
князь:кня́з мо_c1_Ь_ЬЯ-ЕЙ "weight: 4.672994910033701" ;
кум:ку́м мо_c1_Plовья-ёв "weight: 3.448027210100422" ;
муж:му́ж мо_c1_JPl-ЕЙ "weight: 5.369723129674114" ;
сын:сы́н мо_c1_Plовья-ей "weight: 5.526636361100461" ;
мастер:ма́стер мо_c1 "weight: 4.967809142959269" ;
инспектор:инспе́ктор мо_c1 "weight: 4.862582819461245" ;
казак:каза́к мо_d "weight: 4.394481343426497" ;
вор:во́р мо_e "weight: 4.667903605848824" ;
омуль:о́муль мо_e ;
зверь:зве́рь мо_e_зверь "weight: 4.937959668397439" ;
чёрт:ч мо_e_черт ;
конь:ко́нь мо_f ; ! [поэтич._также_мо_2d] "weight: 5.001866487628954" ;
ягнёночек:ягн мо_a_ёночек ;
утёночек:ут мо_a_ёночек ;
мышоночек:мыш мо_a_о́ночек ;
тюленёнок:тюлен мо_a_ёнок ;
котёнок:кот мо_a_ёнок ;
барчонок:барч мо_a_о́нок ;
мышонок:мыш мо_a_о́нок "weight: 3.4587088313171375" ;
полочанин:полоча́н мо_a_ин_Root ;
славянин:славя́н мо_a_ин_Suffix "weight: 3.74508338472869" ;
ржевитянин:ржевитя́н мо_a_ин_Root ;
татарин:тата́р мо_a_ин_ы "weight: 4.073628808108347" ;
хазарин:хаза́р мо_a_ин_ы ;
гражданин:гра́ждан мо_a_ин_Suffix "weight: 5.05942059577165" ;
бесёнок:бес мо_a_ёнок_еня́та ;
вражонок:враж мо_a_о́нок_еня́та ;
барин: мо_c_барин "weight: 4.5239349451596285" ;
ребёночек: мо_a_ребёночек ;
чертёнок:черт мо_a_ёнок_еня́та ;
шурин:шу́р мо_a_шурин "weight: 3.4676599491383264" ;
господин:госпо́д мо_c1_ин_а "weight: 5.242621313085507" ;
ребёнок: мо_ребенок ;
обезьяночеловек:обезья̀но мо_человек ;
домохозяин:домохозя́ мо_a_ин_ева ;
квартирохозяин:квартѝрохозя́ мо_a_ин_ева ;
лжехристос:лжѐхрист мо_b_христос ;
замруководителя:за̀мруководи́теля мо-жо_0 ;
страшила:страши́ла мо-жо_a "weight: 3.7634004228541937" ;
пария:па́рия мо-жо_a_пария ;
рохля:ро́хля мо-жо_a2 ;
нюня:ню́ня мо-жо_a[2] "weight: 3.0859244446606486" ;
шебарша:шебарша́ мо-жо_b ;
гомоза:гомо́за́ мо-жо_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
немчура:немчу́ра́ мо-жо_b- ;
сирота:сиро́та́ мо-жо_d "weight: 4.116445225542568" ;
неровня:неро́в%^Fеня́ мо-жо_d2 ;
сорвиголова:сорвѝго́л мо-жо_f_ова ;
